Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB374.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1626(g) and 1628 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, are amended to read:Section 1626. Reporting by Candidate and Political Committees and other Persons.--* * *(g) Every person, including an organization under 26 U.S.C. 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), other than a political committee or candidate, who makes independent expenditures or contributes to an organization that makes independent expenditures expressly advocating the election or defeat of a clearly identified candidate, or question appearing on the ballot, other than by contribution to a political committee or candidate, in [an aggregate amount in excess of one hundred dollars ($100)] any amount during a calendar year shall file with the appropriate supervisor, on a form prepared by the Secretary of the Commonwealth, a report which shall include the same information required of a candidate or political committee receiving such a contribution and, additionally, the name of the candidate or question supported or opposed. Reports required by this subsection shall be filed on dates on which reports by political committees making expenditures are required to report under this section.* * *Section 1628. Late Contributions and Independent Expenditures.--Any candidate or political committee, authorized by a candidate and created solely for the purpose of influencing an election on behalf of that candidate, which receives any contribution or pledge of five hundred dollars ($500) or more, and any person, including an organization under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), making an independent expenditure or contribution to an organization that makes independent expenditures, as defined by this act, of [five hundred dollars ($500) or more] any amount after the final pre-election report has been deemed completed shall report such contribution, pledge or expenditure 20250HB0374PN0330 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the appropriate supervisor. Such report shall be sent by the candidate, chairman or treasurer of the political committee within twenty-four (24) hours of receipt of the contribution. It shall be the duty of the supervisor to confirm the substance of such report. The report shall be made by telegram, mailgram, overnight mail or facsimile transmission. Any candidate in his own behalf, or chairman, treasurer or candidate in behalf of the political committee may also comply with this section by appearing personally before such supervisor and reporting such late contributions or pledges.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0374PN0330 - 3 - 1234567891011